Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska76-1240
Rules and regulations.

The head of the lead agency shall adopt and promulgate, with the active participation of the heads of other state agencies responsible for funding relocation and acquisition actions and in coordination with local governments, such rules and regulations as may be necessary to carry out the Relocation Assistance Act.

Laws 1989, LB 254, § 27.